src/morphology/affixes/symbols.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

!! !!!Symbol affixes

LEXICON Noun_symbols_possibly_inflected
 +N+Symbol: SYMBOL_connector ;

LEXICON Noun_symbols_never_inflected
 +N+Symbol: # ;

LEXICON SYMBOL_connector
               SYMBOL_NO_suff ; ! §
          :%:  SYMBOL_suff    ; ! §:sne
 +Err/Orth:    SYMBOL_suff    ; ! §esne
 +Err/Orth:%-e SYMBOL_suff    ; ! §-esne
 +Err/Orth:%'e SYMBOL_suff    ; ! §'esne


! NB! Is it really correct that symbols can take clitics? Looks very strange to
! me, I suggest changing to #, as in sma.
LEXICON SYMBOL_NO_suff
 +Sg+Nom:   K         ; ! §
!+Sg+Gen:   K         ; ! §
!+Sg+Acc:   K         ; ! §

LEXICON SYMBOL_suff
!             K ; ! § 14 (no case on the bare §). Oh, yes. Case.
 +Sg+Gen:     K ; ! §:a  (case suffix on the rest, in case of explicit
 +Sg+Gen:a    K ; ! §:a  (case suffix on the rest, in case of explicit
 +Sg+Acc:av   K ; !       suffix)
 +Sg+Ill:aj   K ;
 +Sg+Ine:n    K ;
 +Sg+Ine:an   K ;
 +Sg+Ela:s    K ; ! §:s
 +Sg+Ela:as   K ; ! §:as
 +Sg+Com:in   K ;
    +Ess:an   K ;
 +Pl+Nom:a    K ;
 +Pl+Gen:aj   K ;
 +Pl+Acc:ajt  K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ajda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:ajn  K ;
 +Pl+Ela:ajs  K ;
 +Pl+Com:aj   K ;
